Massachusetts, session 194th, H4449.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 30B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4 the following section:-  
Section 4A. (a) For procurement contracts for supplies and services, including 
construction, that are estimated to cost more than $100,000, each awarding authority shall ensure 
that solicitations or invitations for bids require that the offeror represent, to the best of the 
offeror's knowledge and belief, whether there has been any Occupational Safety and Health 
Administration citation, notice, decision, or civil judgment rendered against the company, as a 
sole proprietorship, limited partnership, and/or limited liability partnership/corporation and/or 
any affiliated business or subsidiary of which the applicant is owner, manager, officer, and/or 
director within the preceding 2-year period for a violation of the federal Occupational Safety and 
Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678, including any settlement agreement and 
documentation verifying if hazards identified have been corrected.  

of 4 13    (b) An awarding authority, prior to making an award, shall, as part of responsibility 
determination, provide an offeror with an opportunity to disclose any steps taken to correct any 
violations of or improve compliance with said federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 
1970, including any settlement agreement and documentation verifying if hazards identified have 
been corrected.  
(c) An awarding authority shall consider the information provided pursuant to 
subsections (a) and (b) in determining whether an offeror is a responsible source.  
(d) For any subcontract where the estimated value of the supplies and services required 
exceeds $100,000, an awarding authority shall require that, at the time of execution of the 
contract, a contractor represents to the contracting agency that the contractor will require each 
subcontractor to disclose to the awarding authority any serious, willful, or repeat citation, notice, 
decision or civil judgment, rendered against the subcontractor within the preceding 2-year period 
for a violation of said federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, said  29 U.S.C 
sections 651 to 678, including any settlement agreement and documentation verifying if hazards 
identified, have been corrected, and to provide to the awarding authority updated information 
every 6 months.  
(e) As appropriate, an awarding authority shall refer matters related to information 
provided pursuant to subsections (a), (b), and (d) of this section to the appropriate agency.  
(f)  During the performance of the contract, each awarding authority shall require that 
every 6 months contractors subject to this section update the information provided pursuant to 
subsection (a).  

of 4 34   (g) If information regarding a serious, willful or repeat citation, notice, decision, or civil 
judgment, rendered against the offeror within the preceding 2-year period for any violations of 
said federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, said 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678, 
including any settlement agreements and documentation verifying if hazards identified have 
corrected, or similar information is obtained through other sources, an awarding authority may 
request a copy of a citation and evidence of abatement of a hazard, and refer the offeror to 
appropriate agencies if a hazard has not been abated.  
(h) An awarding authority shall require that if information regarding a serious, willful or 
repeat citation, notice, decision or civil judgment, rendered against a contractor’s subcontractor 
within the preceding 2-year period for any violations of said federal Occupational Safety and 
Health Act of 1970, said 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678 is brought to the attention of the 
contractor or similar information is obtained through other sources, then the contractor shall 
inform the awarding authority and the awarding authority may request a copy of a citation and 
evidence of abatement of a hazard, and refer the subcontractor to appropriate agencies if a hazard 
has not been abated.  
(i) As appropriate, awarding authorities shall send information provided pursuant to 
subsection (a) and subsection (d) of this section to the appropriate agency.  
(j) Nothing in this section shall preclude the exercise or enforcement of any lawful rights 
or remedies.  
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 82A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth sentence on line 13 the 
following sentence:- A person making application for a trench excavation permit shall disclose in 

of 4 56 writing: (a) Any serious, willful, or repeat citation, notice, decision or civil judgment rendered 
against the company, as a sole proprietorship, limited partnership, and/or limited liability 
partnership/corporation and/or any affiliated business or subsidiary of which the applicant is 
owner, manager, officer, and/or director within the preceding 2-year period for a violation of the 
federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C sections 651 to 678, including any 
settlement agreement and documentation verifying if hazards identified have been corrected; and  
(b) (i) any prior suspension or revocation of a trench excavation permit held by the 
applicant; (ii) any assessment of fines in relation to a trench excavation permit held by applicant; 
(iii) any prior immediate shutdown of a trench site by state or local authorities in relation to a 
trench excavation permit held by applicant; and (iv) the date of each incident.